Florida, session 2026, SB1670.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (136) is added to section 320.08058, 12 Florida Statutes, to read: 13 320.08058âSpecialty license plates.â 14 (136)âOUTSIDER LICENSE PLATES.â 15 (a)âThe department shall develop an Outsider license plate 16 as provided in this section and s. 320.08053. The plate must 17 bear the colors and design approved by the department. The word 18 âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the plate, and the word 19 âOUTSIDERâ must appear at the bottom of the plate. 20 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 21 distributed to the Hoober Brothers Foundation, Inc., a nonprofit 22 corporation under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 23 which may use up to 10 percent of the proceeds for 24 administrative costs and marketing of the plate. The Hoober 25 Brothers Foundation, Inc., shall use the remainder of the 26 proceeds to create and restore iconic public destinations across 27 this state. 28 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.